Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2102
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that a significant number of consumers have sought to acquire ownership of personal property through consumer rental purchase agreements. Often consumer rental purchase agreements have been offered without adequate cost disclosures. It is the purpose of the Consumer Rental Purchase Agreement Act to assure meaningful disclosure of the terms of consumer rental purchase agreements, to make consumers aware of the total cost attendant with such agreements, to inform the consumer when ownership will transfer, and to assure accurate disclosures of rental purchase terms in advertising.

Laws 1989, LB 681, § 2.